Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 3. Motor Buses

§ 881.
Compulsory liability insurance or bond.

The Commissioner shall not register a motor bus, and a person shall not operate or cause to be operated upon any public highway a motor bus, until the owner thereof has procured insurance or a bond having a surety company authorized to transact business in this State as surety thereon. The insurance or surety bond shall indemnify the insured against any legal liability for personal injury or the death of any person or property damage, which injury, death, or damage results from or is caused by the use or operation of the motor bus described in the contract of insurance or such bond.

HISTORY:

Amended

2015, No. 47

, § 22.

§ 882.
Insurer or surety as co-defendant.

The insurer or surety may be made a co-defendant with the owner of such motor bus in an action for such injury, death, or property damage.

§ 883.
Amount of insurance or bond.

The amount of insurance or of such bond that an owner of a motor bus shall carry as insurance or indemnity against claims for personal injury, death, or property damage shall be determined by the Transportation Board. Such policy or bond shall also indemnify the insured against legal liability resulting from damage to property to the amount of $2,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

2015, No. 47

, § 23.

§ 884.
Proof of insurance; notice of cancellation.

A company issuing such insurance or indemnity bond shall file with the Commissioner proof that the required insurance or indemnity bond has been issued as shall be satisfactory to the Commissioner and such insurance or bond shall not lapse, expire, or be cancelled while the registration is in force until at least 20 days’ written notice of an intention to cancel has been given to the Commissioner. Upon receipt of the notice, the Commissioner shall immediately notify the insured of such intention to cancel, and that if other insurance or indemnity bond is not furnished within 15 days thereafter, the registration of the motor buses of the insured shall be cancelled and the number plates of such motor buses will be taken up by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 166.

§ 885.
Waiver of defenses against injured party.

When evidence of insurance is offered to the Commissioner that a contract or policy of insurance issued by a liability insurance company or a surety bond has been procured in accordance with the provisions of section 881 of this title, the presentation of such proof shall include certification that the policy of insurance or bond includes or has appended a certificate waiving, as against injured persons, all defenses based on false representations or breach of warranties as set forth in the application for the policy of liability insurance or indemnity bond by the insured. Such contract or policy of insurance or surety bond shall be for the benefit of a person injured in person or property, to the amounts indicated, to satisfy the legal liability of the insured.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 167.

§ 886.
Injured person may obtain name and description of insurer.

A person injured in person or property by a motor bus may apply to the Commissioner for the name and description of the insurer of the motor bus causing such injury, or the name of the surety upon any indemnity bond or the owner thereof.

§ 887.
Penalties.

A person who violates a provision of sections 881-886 of this title shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

§ 888.
Alternative form of security.

In lieu of all or part of the insurance or bond required by section 881 of this title, a motor bus owner may file with the Commissioner a bond conditioned for the payment and discharge of all liability described in section 881 of this title provided the policy of insurance, if any, or bond is approved by an order of the Transportation Board filed with the Commissioner determining the amount, if any, of insurance to be procured and the amount of a bond in addition to or in substitution for insurance. The Board may approve a bond without surety if it determines, by order made upon proper showing, that a surety on the bond is not required by the public interest because of the proven financial responsibility of the obligor, or because of collateral security consisting of deposits in a Vermont bank or negotiable securities held by such bank as trustee, or a combination thereof, pledged to secure the performance of the bond upon terms and conditions prescribed by the Board. If the order requires insurance or a surety bond, the policy of insurance or surety bond shall be executed by a company authorized to do business in this State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

2015, No. 47

, § 24;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 168.